test/src/morphology/V-musu_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - muˈsú: kiss: # Ordinary verb - full paradigm
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+1Sg+2SgO: iˈkmuˈsuːyán
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+1Sg+3SgO: iˈkmuˈsúː
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+2Sg+1SgO: kimuˈsúːyaˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+2Sg+3SgO: muˈsúːyaˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Sg+1SgO: kimuˈsúː
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Sg+2SgO: muˈsúːyáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Sg+3SgO: muˈsúː
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+1Pl+2SgO: iˈkaːmuˈsuːyáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+1Pl+3SgO: iˈkmuˈsuːyáːuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+12Pl+3SgO: muˈsúːyáːuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+2Pl+1SgO: kilaːmuˈsuːyáːuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+2Pl+3SgO: muˈsúːyáːˈtít
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Pl+1SgO: kintamuˈsúː
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Pl+2SgO: tamuˈsúːyáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Pl+3SgO: tamuˈsúː

     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+1Sg+2PlO: iˈkaːmuˈsuːyán
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+1Sg+3PlO: iˈkaːmuˈsúː
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+2Sg+1PlO: kilaːmuˈsúːyaˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+2Sg+3PlO: kaːmuˈsúːyaˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Sg+1PlO: kinkaːmuˈsúːyáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Sg+2PlO: kaːmuˈsúːyáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Sg+3PlO: kaːmuˈsúː
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+1Pl+2PlO: iˈkaːmuˈsuːyáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+1Pl+3PlO: iˈkmuˈsuːyáːuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+12Pl+3PlO: muˈsúːyáːuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+2Pl+1PlO: kilaːmuˈsuːyáːuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+2Pl+3PlO: muˈsúːyáːˈtít
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Pl+1PlO: kintamuˈsúː
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Pl+2PlO: tamuˈsúːyáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Impf+3Pl+3PlO: tamuˈsúː

     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+1Sg+2SgO: iˈkmuˈsuːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+1Sg+3SgO: iˈkmuˈsúːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+2Sg+1SgO: kimuˈsúːˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+2Sg+3SgO: muˈsúːˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Sg+1SgO: kimuˈsúːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Sg+2SgO: muˈsúːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Sg+3SgO: muˈsúːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+1Pl+2SgO: iˈkaːmuˈsuːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+1Pl+3SgO: iˈkmuˈsúːj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+12Pl+3SgO: muˈsúːyáːuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+2Pl+1SgO: kilaːmuˈsuːj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+2Pl+3SgO: muˈsúːtít
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Pl+1SgO: kintamuˈsúːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Pl+2SgO: tamuˈsúːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Pl+3SgO: tamuˈsúːlh

     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+1Sg+2PlO: iˈkaːmuˈsuːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+1Sg+3PlO: iˈkaːmuˈsúːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+2Sg+1PlO: kilaːmuˈsúːj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+2Sg+3PlO: kaːmuˈsúːˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Sg+1PlO: kinkaːmuˈsúːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Sg+2PlO: kaːmuˈsúːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Sg+3PlO: kaːmuˈsúːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+1Pl+2PlO: iˈkaːmuˈsuːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+1Pl+3PlO: iˈkaːmuˈsúːj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+12Pl+3PlO: kaːmuˈsúːj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+2Pl+1PlO: kilaːmuˈsúːj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+2Pl+3PlO: kaːmuˈsúːtít
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Pl+1PlO: kinkaːtamuˈsúːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Pl+2PlO: kaːtamuˈsúːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Pfv+3Pl+3PlO: tamuˈsúːlh

     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+1Sg+2SgO: iˈkmuˈsuːmáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+1Sg+3SgO: iˈkmuˈsuːmáːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+2Sg+1SgO: kimuˈsuːpáːˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+2Sg+3SgO: muˈsuːpáːˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Sg+1SgO: kimuˈsuːmáːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Sg+2SgO: muˈsuːmáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Sg+3SgO: muˈsuːmáːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+1Pl+2SgO: iˈkaːmuˈsuːmáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+1Pl+3SgO: iˈkmuˈsuːmaːˈnáuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+12Pl+3SgO: muˈsuːmaːnáuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+2Pl+1SgO: kilaːmuˈsuːmaːˈnáuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+2Pl+3SgO: muˈsuːpáːˈnaˈntít
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Pl+1SgO: kintamuˈsuːmaːˈnálh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Pl+2SgO: tamuˈsuːmaːnán
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Pl+3SgO: tamuˈsuːmaːˈnálh

     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+1Sg+2PlO: iˈkamuˈsuːmáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+1Sg+3PlO: iˈkamuˈsuːmáːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+2Sg+1PlO: kilamuˈsuːmaːˈnáuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+2Sg+3PlO: kamuˈsuːpáːˈ
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Sg+1PlO: kinkamuˈsuːmáːnán
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Sg+2PlO: kamuˈsuːmáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Sg+3PlO: kamuˈsuːmáːlh
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+1Pl+2PlO: iˈkaːmuˈsuːmáːn
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+1Pl+3PlO: iˈkamuˈsuːmaːˈnáuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+12Pl+3PlO: kaːmuˈsuːmaːnáuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+2Pl+1PlO: kilaːmuˈsuːmaːˈnáuj
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+2Pl+3PlO: kaːmuˈsuːpáːˈnaˈntít
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Pl+1PlO: kinkatamuˈsuːmaːˈnán
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Pl+2PlO: kaːtamuˈsuːmaːˈnán
     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prog+3Pl+3PlO: tamuˈsuːmaːˈnálh










     
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prt+1Sg: xaˈkmuˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prt+2Sg: iˈxmuˈsúːyaˈ
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: ixmuˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prt+1Pl: xaˈktaxtuyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prt+12Pl: iˈxtaxtuyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prt+2Pl: iˈxtaxtuyaːˈtít
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Prt+3Pl: iˈxtamuˈsúː
#     
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Fut+1Sg: naˈkmuˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Fut+2Sg: namuˈsúːyaˈ
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Fut+3Sg: namuˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Fut+1Pl: naˈktaxtuyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Fut+12Pl: nataxtuyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Fut+2Pl: nataxtuyaːˈtít
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Fut+3Pl: natamuˈsúː
#
#     muˈsúː+V+Opt+1Sg: kaˈmuˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Opt+2Sg: kamuˈsúːyaˈ
#     muˈsúː+V+Opt+3Sg: kamuˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Opt+1Pl: kaˈktaxtuyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Opt+12Pl: kamuˈsúːyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Opt+2Pl: kamuˈsúːyáːˈtít
#     muˈsúː+V+Opt+3Pl: katamuˈsúː
#     
#     muˈsúː+V+Pot+1Sg: iˈktiˈmuˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Pot+2Sg: tiˈmuˈsúːyaˈ
#     muˈsúː+V+Pot+3Sg: tiˈmuˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Pot+1Pl: iˈktiˈtaxtuyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Pot+12Pl: tiˈmuˈsúːyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Pot+2Pl: tiˈmuˈsúːyáːˈtít
#     muˈsúː+V+Pot+3Pl: tiˈtamuˈsúː
#     
#     muˈsúː+V+Irr+1Sg: xaˈkmuˈsúːlh
#     muˈsúː+V+Irr+2Sg: iˈxtáxtuˈ
#     muˈsúː+V+Irr+3Sg: iˈxmuˈsúːlh
#     muˈsúː+V+Irr+1Pl: xaˈkmuˈsúːj
#     muˈsúː+V+Irr+12Pl: iˈxmuˈsúːj
#     muˈsúː+V+Irr+2Pl: iˈxtaxtuˈtít
#     muˈsúː+V+Irr+3Pl: iˈxtamuˈsúːlh
#     
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Imp+1Sg: imuˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Imp+2Sg: muˈsúːyaˈ
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Imp+3Sg: muˈsúː
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Imp+1Pl: iˈktaxtuyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Imp+12Pl: muˈsúːyáːuj
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Imp+2Pl: muˈsúːyáːˈtít
#     muˈsúː+V+Ind+Imp+3Pl: tamuˈsúː
     
